Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 5. Liens on Lumber Products; Registration of Marks

§ 2011.
Nature and extent of lien; registered marks.

If a person, firm, or corporation shall, by itself or others, make an advance or series of advances of money to the owner of, or person entitled to the possession of, any logs or pulpwood for the purpose of financing the cutting, hauling, yarding, piling, trucking, rafting, booming, driving, or towing of the same, it shall have a lien for the amount of all such advances, which shall take precedence over all claims, except taxes and liens provided for and enforceable under section 1991 of this title, and except all other liens legally acquired and filed or recorded prior to the placing of the registered mark thereon as herein provided, upon all of such logs or pulpwood on which it has caused its registered mark to be placed, and such lien with respect to such advances shall continue for all advances for two years after the date of making the last advance, and may be enforced by attachment. The term “registered mark” as used in the foregoing sentence means a mark described in a certificate of registration issued by the Secretary of State, pursuant to the provisions of section 2012 of this title, and recorded in the town clerk’s office for the town in which such logs or pulpwood were situated when such registered mark was placed thereon, or if the logs or pulpwood were situated in an unorganized town, gore, or grant, said registered mark must be recorded by the clerk of the county in which such unorganized town, gore, or grant is situated.

§ 2012.
Registration of marks; regulations.

Any person, firm, or corporation desiring to appropriate for its own exclusive use any distinctive mark to be placed upon logs or pulpwood for identification may file a copy of such mark, accompanied by a statement claiming the exclusive use thereof for such purpose, with the Secretary of State, who, if satisfied that such mark is not the duplicate of, or deceptively similar to, any such mark theretofore registered in his or her office, shall register, and issue to and in the name of such person, firm, or corporation a certificate of registration of such mark.
The person, firm, or corporation in whose name such certificate of registration is issued shall be entitled to the exclusive use of the mark therein described for all purposes of this subchapter.
The fee for such filing and recording and for a duly attested certificate of the record thereof shall be $10.00.
The Secretary may make such rules and regulations and prescribe such forms as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this subchapter.

§ 2013.
Certified copies of certificates; fee.

The town clerk shall receive a fee of $6.00 for recording a certified copy of any such certificate of registration.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 84

, § 2;

1979, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1993, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2003, No. 70

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. March 1, 2004.

§ 2014.
Recording; fees.

No lien as provided for in this subchapter shall be valid, except as against the person to whom such advances were made, until written notice of advances made or to be made is recorded with the town clerk of the town wherein such logs or pulpwood are situated, or if the logs or pulpwood are situated in an unorganized town, gore, or grant, said written notice must be recorded by the clerk of the county in which such unorganized town, gore, or grant is situated.
Five dollars shall be paid to the town or county clerk for recording said written notice.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 84

, § 3;

1979, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.